Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1129
Training sessions; council; prescribe forms; adopt rules and regulations.

The council shall prescribe the necessary forms and adopt and promulgate such rules and regulations as shall be necessary to carry out the provisions of section 46-1128 regarding the conducting of training sessions and the issuing of certificates.

Laws 1986, LB 284, § 29.